Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1533
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1973, LB 349, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 175;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 15.